Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.260

Administrative procedure act to govern administration.

The administration of this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 26.]